New York, session 2025-2026, A8535.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1174-b to read as follows: 3 § 1174-b. Owner liability for failure of operator to stop for a stop 4 sign in the village of Southampton. (a) Notwithstanding any other 5 provision of law, the village of Southampton located within the county 6 of Suffolk is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and amend a local 7 law or ordinance establishing a demonstration program imposing monetary 8 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 9 to comply with subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred seventy-two of 10 this article. Such demonstration program shall empower such village to 11 install and operate stop sign photo violation monitoring systems which 12 may be stationary or mobile, and which may be installed on stop signs 13 within the boundaries of such village. 14 (b) Such demonstration program shall utilize necessary technologies to 15 ensure, to the extent practicable, that photographs produced by such 16 stop sign photo violation monitoring systems shall not include images 17 that identify the driver, the passengers, or the contents of the vehi- 18 cle. Provided, however, that no notice of liability issued pursuant to 19 this section shall be dismissed solely because a photograph or photo- 20 graphs allow for the identification of the driver, passengers, or the 21 contents of a vehicle, provided that such village has made a reasonable 22 effort to comply with the provisions of this paragraph. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11881-04-5 A. 8535--A 2 1 (c) In any such village which has adopted a local law or ordinance 2 pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section, the owner of a vehicle 3 shall be liable for a penalty imposed pursuant to this section if such 4 vehicle was used or operated with the permission of the owner, express 5 or implied, in violation of subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred 6 seventy-two of this article, and such violation is evidenced by informa- 7 tion obtained from a stop sign photo violation monitoring system. 8 (d) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 9 following meanings: 10 1. "Owner" shall have the meaning as defined pursuant to section two 11 hundred thirty-nine of this chapter. 12 2. "Village" shall mean the village of Southampton. 13 3. "Stop sign photo violation monitoring system" shall mean a vehicle 14 sensor installed to work in conjunction with a stop sign which automat- 15 ically produces two or more photographs, two or more microphotographs, a 16 videotape or other recorded images of each vehicle at the time it is 17 used or operated in violation of subdivision (a) of section eleven 18 hundred seventy-two of this article. 19 4. "Operator" means any person, corporation, firm, partnership, agen- 20 cy, association, organization or lessee that uses or operates a vehicle 21 with or without the permission of the owner, and an owner who operates 22 such owner's own vehicle. 23 (e) A certificate, sworn to or affirmed by a technician employed by 24 the village in which the charged violation occurred, or a facsimile 25 thereof, based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, vide- 26 otape or other recorded images produced by a stop sign photo violation 27 monitoring system, shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained 28 therein. Any photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded 29 images evidencing such a violation shall be available for inspection in 30 any proceeding to adjudicate the liability for such violation pursuant 31 to a local law or ordinance adopted pursuant to this section. 32 (f) An owner liable for a violation of subdivision (a) of section 33 eleven hundred seventy-two of this article pursuant to a local law or 34 ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall be liable for monetary 35 penalties in accordance with a schedule of fines and penalties to be set 36 forth in such local law or ordinance. The liability of the owner pursu- 37 ant to this section shall not exceed fifty dollars for each violation; 38 provided, however, that such local law or ordinance may provide for an 39 additional penalty not in excess of twenty-five dollars for each 40 violation for the failure to respond to a notice of liability within the 41 prescribed time period. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 42 law to the contrary, all revenues from the program established pursuant 43 to this section shall be dedicated to law enforcement purposes within 44 the village of Southampton. 45 (g) An imposition of liability under a local law or ordinance adopted 46 pursuant to this section shall not be deemed a conviction as an operator 47 and shall not be made part of the operating record of the person upon 48 whom such liability is imposed nor shall it be used for insurance 49 purposes in the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage. 50 (h) 1. A notice of liability shall be sent by first class mail to each 51 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of subdivision 52 (a) of section eleven hundred seventy-two of this article pursuant to 53 this section. Personal delivery on the owner shall not be required. A 54 manual or automatic record of mailing prepared in the ordinary course of 55 business shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein. A. 8535--A 3 1 2. A notice of liability shall contain the name and address of the 2 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of subdivision 3 (a) of section eleven hundred seventy-two of this article pursuant to 4 this section, the registration number of the vehicle involved in such 5 violation, the location where such violation took place, the date and 6 time of such violation and the identification number of the camera which 7 recorded the violation or other document locator number. 8 3. The notice of liability shall contain information advising the 9 person charged of the manner and the time in which such person may 10 contest the liability alleged in the notice. Such notice of liability 11 shall also contain a warning to advise the persons charged that failure 12 to contest in the manner and time provided shall be deemed an admission 13 of liability and that a default judgment may be entered thereon. 14 4. The notice of liability shall be prepared and mailed by the village 15 where the alleged violation occurred or by any other entity authorized 16 by such village to prepare and mail such notification of violation. 17 (i) Adjudication of the liability imposed upon owners by this section 18 shall be by the court having jurisdiction over traffic infractions. 19 (j) If an owner receives a notice of liability pursuant to this 20 section for any time period during which the vehicle was reported to the 21 police department as having been stolen, it shall be a valid defense to 22 an allegation of liability for a violation of subdivision (a) of section 23 eleven hundred seventy-two of this article pursuant to this section that 24 the vehicle had been reported to the police as stolen prior to the time 25 the violation occurred and had not been recovered by such time. For 26 purposes of asserting the defense provided by this subdivision, it shall 27 be sufficient that a certified copy of the police report on the stolen 28 vehicle be sent by first class mail to the court having jurisdiction. 29 (k) An owner who is a lessor of a vehicle to which a notice of liabil- 30 ity was issued pursuant to subdivision (h) of this section shall not be 31 liable for the violation of subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred 32 seventy-two of this article, provided that such owner sends to the court 33 having jurisdiction a copy of the rental, lease or other such contract 34 document covering such vehicle on the date of the violation, with the 35 name and address of the lessee clearly legible, within thirty-seven days 36 after receiving notice from the court of the date and time of such 37 violation, together with the other information contained in the original 38 notice of liability. Failure to send such information within such thir- 39 ty-seven day time period shall render the owner liable for the penalty 40 prescribed by this section. Where the lessor complies with the 41 provisions of this subdivision, the lessee of such vehicle on the date 42 of such violation shall be deemed to be the owner of such vehicle for 43 purposes of this section, shall be subject to liability for the 44 violation of subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred seventy-two of 45 this article pursuant to this section and shall be sent a notice of 46 liability pursuant to subdivision (h) of this section. 47 (l) 1. If the owner liable for a violation of subdivision (a) of 48 section eleven hundred seventy-two of this article pursuant to this 49 section was not the operator of the vehicle at the time of the 50 violation, the owner may maintain an action for indemnification against 51 the operator. 52 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no owner of a 53 vehicle shall be subject to a monetary fine imposed pursuant to this 54 section if the operator of such vehicle was operating such vehicle with- 55 out the consent of the owner at the time such operator failed to obey a 56 stop sign. For purposes of this subdivision there shall be a presumption A. 8535--A 4 1 that the operator of such vehicle was operating such vehicle with the 2 consent of the owner at the time such operator failed to obey a stop 3 sign. 4 (m) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability 5 of an operator of a vehicle for any violation of subdivision (a) of 6 section eleven hundred seventy-two of this article. 7 (n) Any village that adopts a demonstration program pursuant to subdi- 8 vision (a) of this section shall submit an annual report detailing the 9 results of the use of such stop sign photo violation monitoring system 10 to the governor, the temporary president of the senate and the speaker 11 of the assembly on or before the first day of June next succeeding the 12 effective date of this section and on the same date in each succeeding 13 year in which the demonstration program is operable. Such report shall 14 include, but not be limited to: 15 1. a description of the locations where stop sign photo violation 16 monitoring systems were used; 17 2. the aggregate number, type and severity of accidents reported at 18 intersections where a stop sign photo violation monitoring system is 19 used for the three years preceding the installation of such system, to 20 the extent the information is maintained by the department; 21 3. the aggregate number, type and severity of accidents reported at 22 intersections where a stop sign photo violation monitoring system is 23 used for the reporting year, as well as for each year that the stop sign 24 photo violation monitoring system has been operational, to the extent 25 the information is maintained by the department; 26 4. the number of events and number of violations recorded at each 27 intersection where a stop sign photo violation monitoring system is used 28 and in the aggregate on a daily, weekly and monthly basis; 29 5. the number of notices of liability issued for violations recorded 30 by such system at each intersection where a stop sign photo violation 31 monitoring system is used; 32 6. the number of fines imposed and total amount of fines paid after 33 first notice of liability; 34 7. the number and percentage of violations adjudicated and results of 35 such adjudications including breakdowns of dispositions made for 36 violations recorded by such systems which shall be provided at least 37 annually to such village by the court and conducting such adjudications; 38 8. the total amount of revenue realized by such village from such 39 adjudications including a breakdown of revenue realized by such village 40 for each year since deployment of its stop sign photo violation monitor- 41 ing system; 42 9. expenses incurred by such village in connection with the program; 43 and 44 10. quality of the adjudication process and its results which shall be 45 provided at least annually to such village by the court conducting such 46 adjudications. 47 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 87 of the public officers law is amended 48 by adding a new paragraph (v) to read as follows: 49 (v) are photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded 50 images prepared under authority of section eleven hundred seventy-four-b 51 of the vehicle and traffic law. 52 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 53 have become a law, and shall expire 5 years after such effective date 54 when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed.